Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.435

Investment reserve account abolished—Deposit of moneys.

The investment reserve account is hereby abolished. All moneys in the investment reserve account on *the effective date of this act shall be deposited in the general fund.

[ 1981 c 242 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For "the effective date of this act," see note following RCW 43.79.330.

Effective dates—1981 c 242: See note following RCW 43.79.330.